Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-508
Museums; public use; admission charges; rules and regulations.

Every museum supported by public tax shall be open to the use of the public, subject to such reasonable regulations and admission charges as the museum board may adopt to render such museum of the greatest use to the public. The board may exclude from the use of the museum any person who shall willfully violate or refuse to comply with rules and regulations established for the government thereof. The power of the museum board under this section may be exercised by the other contracting party as set forth in a contract which has been entered into by a city or village for the use of a museum already established.

Laws 1957, c. 224, § 8, p. 769;

Laws 1963, c. 306, § 5, p. 905;

Laws 1989, LB 444, § 2.